src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective   !!= * **@CODE@** is the main lexicon
ávos A_ODD_Å ; !happy, glad
grávvat:grávv A_ODD_S ;
rádes:rád A_ODD_AA ;  !inlagt även alt.form rádep, rádemus
rávvat:rávv A_ODD_S ;
sjlusgos A_ODD_Å ;
stumbu:stumbu A_ODD_Ä ;
suddes:sudd A_ODD_AA ; 
tjuavvgat:tju A_ODD_Y ;
